District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.76

Jurisdiction of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia as to prosecutions for violations of provisions of chapter.

All prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia, by the Corporation Counsel or any of his assistants.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 139, ch. 222, § 76
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 40-476.
1973 Ed., § 40-492.

Prior Codifications